Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.863, is amended to read: 626.863 UNAUTHORIZED PRACTICE. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin General prohibition. new text end (a) A person who is not a peace officer or part-time peace officer is guilty of a misdemeanor if the person: (1) makes a representation of being a peace officer or part-time peace officer, or (2) performs or attempts to perform an act, duty, or responsibility reserved by law for licensed peace officers and part-time peace officers. (b) A peace officer who authorizes or knowingly allows a person to violate paragraph (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Federal law enforcement officers. new text end new text begin A federal law enforcement officer performing duties within the state is guilty of a misdemeanor if the person does not: new text end new text begin (1) hold an associate's or bachelor's degree; and new text end new text begin (2) meet the standards established by the board for licensure as a Minnesota peace officer in Minnesota Rules, part 6700.0700, subpart 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Investigations; prosecutions. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end The board shall designate the appropriate law enforcement agency to investigate violations of this section. The attorney general shall prosecute violations of this section. new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Repeat violations. new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end A person who violates this section and who has previously been convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "federal law enforcement officer" means an officer or employee of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the Drug Enforcement Administration, the United States Marshal Service, the Secret Service, the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, the Department of Homeland Security, or the United States Postal Inspection Service, or their successor agencies, who is responsible for the prevention or detection of crimes or for the enforcement of the United States Code and who is authorized to arrest, with or without a warrant, any individual for a violation of the United States Code. new text end